Utah statutes.
67-19-14.2.   Unused Sick Leave Retirement Option Program -- Creation --
Payout upon eligibility for allowance -- Continuing medical and life insurance
benefits after retirement.
(1) (a)  There is created the "Unused Sick Leave Retirement Option Program I."
(b)  An agency may offer the Unused Sick Leave Retirement Option Program I to
an employee who is eligible to receive a retirement allowance in accordance
with Title 49, Utah State Retirement and Insurance Benefit Act.
(2)  The Unused Sick Leave Retirement Option Program I provides that upon
becoming eligible to receive a retirement allowance an employee who was
employed by the state prior to January 1, 2006:
(a)  receives a contribution under Subsection (3) for 25% of the employee's
unused accumulated sick leave accrued prior to January 1, 2006, at the
employee's rate of pay at the time of retirement;
(b)  receives continuing medical and life insurance benefits until the earlier
of:
(i)  the date the employee reaches the age eligible for Medicare; or
(ii)  up to the following number of years:
(A)  five years if the employee retires during calendar year 2006;
(B)  four years if the employee retires during calendar year 2007;
(C)  three years if the employee retires during calendar year 2008;
(D)  two years if the employee retires during calendar year 2009;
(E)  one year if the employee retires during calendar year 2010; or
(F)  zero years if the employee retires after calendar year 2010; and
(c)  may purchase additional continuing medical and life insurance benefits in
accordance with Subsection (4).
(3) (a)  Subject to federal requirements and limitations, the contribution
under Subsection (2)(a) shall be transferred directly to the employee's
defined contribution plan qualified under Section 401(k) of the Internal
Revenue Code which is sponsored by the Utah State Retirement Board.
(b)  If the amount calculated under Subsection (2)(a) exceeds the federal
contribution limitations, the employee's unused accumulated sick leave hours
representing the excess shall be used for the purchase of continuing medical
and life insurance benefits under Subsection (4).
(4) (a)  An employee may purchase continuing medical and life insurance
benefits, at the rate of one month's coverage per policy for eight hours of
unused sick leave remaining after:
(i)  the contribution of unused sick leave under Subsection (2)(a); and
(ii)  an additional reduction, at the time of retirement, of unused sick leave
hours as follows:
(A)  480 hours if the employee retires during calendar year 2006;
(B)  384 hours if the employee retires during calendar year 2007;
(C)  288 hours if the employee retires during calendar year 2008;
(D)  192 hours if the employee retires during calendar year 2009;
(E)  96 hours if the employee retires during calendar year 2010; or
(F)  0 hours if the employee retires after calendar year 2010.
(b)  The medical coverage level for member, two person, or family coverage
that is provided to the member at the time of retirement is the maximum
coverage level available to the member under this program.
(c)  The purchase of continuing medical and life insurance benefits at the
rate provided under Subsection (4)(a) may be used by the employee to extend
coverage:
(i)  beyond the number of years provided under Subsection (2) until the
employee reaches the age of eligibility for Medicare; or
(ii)  if the employee has reached the age of eligibility for Medicare,
continuing medical benefits for the employee's spouse may be purchased until
the employee's spouse reaches the age of eligibility for Medicare.
(d)  An employee and the employee's spouse who are or who later become
eligible for Medicare may purchase Medicare supplemental insurance at the rate
of one month's coverage for eight hours of the employee's unused sick leave
per person.
(5) (a)  The continuing medical and life insurance benefits received under
Subsection (2)(b) or purchased by an employee under Subsection (4):
(i)  may not be suspended or deferred for future use; and
(ii)  continues in effect until exhausted.
(b)  An employer participating in the Program I benefits under this section
may not provide medical or life insurance benefits to a person who is:
(i)   reemployeed after retirement; and
(ii)  receiving benefits under this section.
